Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 1
PRIMARY ELECTIONS

1-4-101. Primary elections - when - nominations - expenses.

Except as provided in section 1-4-104.5, a primary election shall be held on the last Tuesday in June of even-numbered years to nominate candidates of political parties to be voted for at the succeeding general election. Except as provided by section 1-4-1304 (1.5), only a major political party, as defined in section 1-1-104 (22), is entitled to nominate candidates in a primary election.

Each political party that is entitled to participate in the primary election must have a separate party ballot for use by electors affiliated with that political party. An elector is not required to vote in the same party primary as the elector voted in as part of a presidential primary election occurring in that same year, if such an election is held.

The county clerk and recorder shall send to all active electors in the county who have not declared an affiliation or provided a ballot preference with a political party a mailing that contains the ballots of all of the major political parties. In this mailing, the clerk shall also provide written instructions advising the elector of the manner in which the elector will be in compliance with the requirements of this code in selecting and casting the ballot of a major political party. An elector may cast the ballot of only one major political party. After selecting and casting a ballot of a single major political party, the elector shall return the ballot to the clerk. If an elector casts and returns to the clerk the ballot of more than one major political party, all such ballots returned will be rejected and will not be counted.

The secretary of state may by rule adopt additional ballot requirements necessary to avoid voter confusion in voting in primary elections.

The primary election of all political parties shall be held at the same time and shall be conducted by the same election officials.

All nominations by major political parties for candidates for United States senator, representative in congress, all elective state, district, and county officers, and members of the general assembly shall be made by primary elections; except that, for general elections occurring after January 1, 2001, nominations by major political parties for candidates for lieutenant governor shall not be made by primary elections and shall be made pursuant to section 1-4-502 (3). Neither the secretary of state nor any county clerk and recorder shall place on the official general election ballot the name of any person as a candidate of any major political party who has not been nominated in accordance with the provisions of this article, or who has not been affiliated with the major political party for the period of time required by section 1-4-601, or who does not meet residency requirements for the office, if any. The information found on the voter registration record of the county of current or previous residence of the person seeking to be placed on the ballot is admissible as prima facie evidence of compliance with this article.

Except as otherwise provided in this code, all primary elections shall be conducted in the same manner as general elections insofar as the general election provisions are applicable, and the election officers for primary elections have the same powers and shall perform the same duties as those provided by law for general elections.

All expenses incurred in the preparation or conduct of the primary election shall be paid out of the treasury of the county or state, as the case may be, in the same manner as for general elections.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 321, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 307, § 3, effective January 1, 1982.

L. 83:

(3) amended, p. 350, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1) amended, p. 248, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(3) amended, p. 396, § 6, effective April 17.

L. 88:

(3) amended, p. 293, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 89:

(3) amended, p. 314, § 2, effective April 12.

L. 91:

(3) amended, p. 620, § 31, effective May 1.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 672, § 4, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 98:

(1) to (3) amended, p. 256, § 4, effective April 13.

L. 99:

(3) amended, p. 159, § 7, effective August 4.

L. 2000:

(3) amended, p. 2027, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2003:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1309, § 4, effective April 22.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1015), ch. 259, p. 1183, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(3) amended, (HB 10-1271), ch. 324, p. 1501, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 2011:

(1) amended, (SB 11-189), ch. 243, p. 1062, § 3, effective May 27.

L. 2013:

(1) and (2) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 703, § 28, effective May 10.

Initiated 2016:

(2) amended, Proposition 108, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, December 27, 2016. See L. 2017, p. 2822.

L. 2017:

IP(2) and (2)(a) amended, (SB 17-305), ch. 216, p. 841, § 2, effective August 9.

1-4-102. Methods of placing names on primary ballot.

All candidates for nominations to be made at any primary election shall be placed on the primary election ballot either by certificate of designation by assembly or by petition.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 322, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 673, § 4, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-14-203 as it existed prior to 1980.

1-4-103. Order of names on primary ballot.

Candidates designated and certified by assembly for a particular office shall be placed on the primary election ballot in the order of the vote received at the assembly. The candidate receiving the highest vote shall be placed first in order on the ballot, followed by the candidate receiving the next highest vote. To qualify for placement on the primary election ballot, a candidate must receive thirty percent or more of the votes of the assembly. The names of two or more candidates receiving an equal number of votes for designation by assembly shall be placed on the primary ballot in the order determined by lot in accordance with section 1-4-601 (2). Candidates by petition for any particular office shall follow assembly candidates and shall be placed on the primary election ballot in an order established by lot.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 322, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1214, § 1, effective May 30.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 286, § 7, effective June 26.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 673, § 4, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-14-209 as it existed prior to 1980.

1-4-104. Party nominees.

Candidates voted on for offices at primary elections who receive a plurality of the votes cast shall be the respective party nominees for the respective offices. If more than one office of the same kind is to be filled, the number of candidates equal to the number of offices to be filled receiving the highest number of votes shall be the nominees of the political party for the offices. The names of the nominees shall be printed on the official ballot prepared for the ensuing general election.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 322, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 673, § 4, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 256, § 5, effective April 13.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1309, § 5, effective April 22.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-15-109 as it existed prior to 1980.

1-4-104.5. Primary election canceled - when.

If, at the close of business on the sixtieth day before the primary election, there is not more than one candidate for any political party who has been nominated in accordance with this article or who has filed a write-in candidate affidavit of intent pursuant to section 1-4-1101 for any office on the primary election ballot, the designated election official may cancel the primary election and declare each candidate the party nominee for that office at the general election. For purposes of other applicable law, such nominee shall be deemed a candidate in and the winner of the primary election. The name of each nominee shall be printed on the official ballot prepared for the ensuing general election.

If a major political party has more than one candidate nominated for any office on the primary election ballot, the primary election shall be conducted as provided in section 1-4-101.

If, at the close of business on the sixtieth day before the primary election, there is not more than one candidate for each major political party who has been nominated in accordance with this article for any office on the primary election ballot and a minor political party has more than one candidate nominated for any such office, the primary election shall be conducted as provided in section 1-4-101 for the nomination of the minor political party candidate only.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1015), ch. 259, p. 1183, § 2, effective August 5.

1-4-105. Defeated candidate ineligible.

No person who has been defeated as a candidate in a primary election shall be eligible for election to the same office by ballot or as a write-in candidate in the next general election unless the party vacancy committee nominates that person.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 322, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 620, § 32, effective May 1.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 673, § 4, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-15-110 as it existed prior to 1980.